Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 10
JUDGMENTS OTHER THAN BY DEFAULT

Sec.

§ 16-1001 — 16-1009. Judgments other than by default. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1010. Abstract of judgment

Filing and docketing. [Repealed.]

§ 16-1011, 16-1012. Execution from district court — Judgment not lien unless transcribed — Effect and duration of lien. [Repealed.]